Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as the terms are defined in chapter 66.04 RCW.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington beer commission.

(3) "Department" means the department of agriculture.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's duly authorized representative.

(5) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning with January 1st of any year and ending December 31st.

(6) "Producer" means any person or other entity licensed under Title 66 RCW to produce beer within Washington.

(7) "Referendum" means a vote by producers that is conducted by secret ballot.

[ 2011 c 54 s 1; 2006 c 330 s 2.]